Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201560-6,272
Occupant protection system; three-point safety belt system; violation; penalty.

Any person who violates section 60-6,270 shall be guilty of a traffic infraction and shall be fined twenty-five dollars, but no court costs shall be assessed against him or her nor shall any points be assessed against the driving record of such person. Regardless of the number of persons in such vehicle not wearing an occupant protection system or a three-point safety belt system pursuant to such section, only one violation shall be assessed against the driver of such motor vehicle for each time the motor vehicle is stopped and a violation of such section is found.

Laws 1985, LB 496, § 5;

Laws 1992, LB 958, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,103.06;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 368;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 22;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 37.
August 30, 2015